Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1235.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1101-A of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1101-A. Definitions.--As used in this article:* * *"Ballot set" means one of any number of ballot types each used for a particular method of voting, including absentee 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 ballot voting, mail-in ballot voting, voting in-person at a polling place and voting by emergency paper ballot."Ballot style" means a ballot's particular array of election contests and candidates specific to an election district. Each ballot set shall comprise ballots with various ballot styles.* * *Section 2. Section 1110-A(d) and (e) of the act are amended to read:Section 1110-A. Supplies; Preparation of the Voting System and of Polling Places.--* * *[(d) On or before the fortieth day preceding any election, the county board of elections shall mail to the chairman of the county committee of each political party which shall be entitled under existing laws to participate in primary elections within the county, and to the chairman or presiding officer of any organization of citizens within the county which has as its purpose or among its purposes the investigation or prosecution of election frauds and which has registered its name and address and the names of its principal officers with the county board of elections at least fifty days before the election, a written notice stating the times when and the place or places where preparation of the system and its components for use in the several election districts in the county or municipality will be started. One representative of each such political party, certified by the respective chairman of the county committee of such party, and one representative of each such organization of citizens, certified by the respective chairman or presiding officer of such organization shall be entitled to be present during the preparation of the voting system and its components and to see that they are properly prepared and are in proper 20250HB1235PN1371 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 condition and order for use. Such representatives shall not interfere with the preparation of the system and its components, and the county board may make reasonable rules and regulations governing the conduct of such representatives.(e) Prior to the delivery of any automatic tabulating equipment to any election district the county board of elections shall examine or cause to have examined such equipment and shall make a certificate stating:(1) the identifying number and election district designation of the equipment;(2) that the equipment is suitable for use in the particular election district designated;(3) that the equipment has been tested to ascertain that it will accurately compute the votes cast for all offices and all questions;(4) that the offices and questions on the official ballot correspond in all respects with the ballot labels assigned to such particular election district;(5) that the public counter and the counters for each candidate position and each question are all set at zero and that element that generates a printed record of the results of the election is functioning correctly; and(6) the number on the seal with which the equipment is sealed.]* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1110.1-A. Pre-Election Logic and Accuracy Testing.--(a) Prior to an election in which an electronic voting system is to be used, the county board of elections shall complete logic and accuracy testing for the electronic voting system in 20250HB1235PN1371 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with this section to ensure that voting equipment functions as expected and votes are accurately tabulated.(b) Logic and accuracy testing shall be sufficient to determine that:(1) The electronic voting system is properly programmed.(2) The election is correctly defined on the electronic voting system.(3) All of the input, output and communication devices for the electronic voting system are working properly.(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), logic and accuracy testing shall be completed as soon as ballots are available.(2) If a proceeding is pending in a Federal or State court that would affect the contents of a ballot, logic and accuracy testing shall be completed no later than the eleventh day prior to the election.(d) During logic and accuracy testing, the county board of elections shall:(1) For each voting device that will or may be used in the upcoming election:(i) Generate a report that shows the contest order and confirm that the contest order as reported matches the expected contest order.(ii) Mark, in all available languages using the touchscreen and any other assistive device provided by the manufacturer, and print ballots for each ballot style using a predetermined voting pattern designed such that each contest, and each choice within each contest, is given a unique number of votes.(iii) Review the printed ballots to ensure that the ballots were accurately printed and the votes contained on the printed 20250HB1235PN1371 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ballot match the choices designated by the tester.(iv) Scan the printed ballots to ensure that the ballots will scan and generate the expected results.(v) Shut down, lock and seal the voting device.(vi) Execute a written statement specifying:(A) The electronic voting devices tested.(B) The results of the testing.(C) The protective counter numbers, if applicable, of each tabulation device.(D) The number of the seal securing each tabulation device at the conclusion of testing.(E) Any problems reported to the county board of elections as a result of the testing.(F) The identifying number and election district designation of the device.(G) Whether each device tested is satisfactory or unsatisfactory.(2) For each piece of automatic tabulating equipment that will or may be used in the upcoming election:(i) Generate a report that shows the total number of votes for all contests and candidates and confirm that the totals show as zero for all contests and candidates.(ii) Scan premarked ballots for each ballot style using a predetermined voting pattern designed such that each contest, and each choice within each contest, is given a unique number of votes.(iii) Generate a report that shows the vote totals for each contest and candidate and compare the reported results to the expected results to ensure that the automatic tabulating equipment will generate the expected results.20250HB1235PN1371 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Reset all vote totals, shut down, lock and seal the automated tabulating equipment.(v) Execute a written statement specifying:(A) The automatic tabulation equipment tested.(B) The results of the testing.(C) The protective counter numbers, if applicable, of each tabulation device.(D) The number of the seal securing each tabulation device at the conclusion of testing.(E) Any problems reported to the county board of elections as a result of the testing.(F) Whether each device tested is satisfactory or unsatisfactory.(e) The Secretary of the Commonwealth may:(1) Prescribe additional requirements relating to logic and accuracy testing as the Secretary of the Commonwealth deems appropriate.(2) Issue directives and instructions for the implementation and administration of this section, but only if the directives and instructions do not conflict with the requirements of this section.(f) No later than seven days prior to beginning logic and accuracy testing, the county board of elections shall give notice of the times and places in which the logic and accuracy testing will be conducted as follows:(1) The county board of elections shall mail the notice to:(i) The chairperson of the county committee of each political party that is entitled to participate in primary elections within the county.(ii) The chairperson or presiding officer of each 20250HB1235PN1371 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization within the county whose purpose includes the investigation or prosecution of election frauds and that has registered its name and address and the names of its principal officers with the county board of elections by the first Monday in February of the year.(2) The county board of elections shall post the notice on its publicly accessible Internet website.(3) The county board of elections shall publish the notice in accordance with section 106, with the notice to be published once.(g) The county board of elections shall allow in-person observation of logic and accuracy testing in accordance with the following procedures:(1) One representative from each political party whose chairperson is entitled to receive notice under subsection (f)(1)(i) may observe the logic and accuracy testing, if the representative is certified by the chairperson of the county committee of the party.(2) One representative of each organization entitled to receive notice under subsection (f)(1)(ii) may observe the logic and accuracy testing if the representative is certified by the chairperson or presiding officer of the organization.(3) A registered elector of the county who gives the county board of elections at least twenty-four hours' notice may observe the logic and accuracy testing.(4) A representative or a registered elector who observes the logic and accuracy testing may not interfere with the testing.(5) The county board of elections may make reasonable rules and regulations governing the conduct of the representatives and 20250HB1235PN1371 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registered electors during the logic and accuracy testing. The rules and regulations must be published as part of the notice required under subsection (f).(h) No later than five days after completing logic and accuracy testing, the county board of elections shall certify compliance with the requirements of this section to the Secretary of the Commonwealth in a manner and on a form as prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The Department of State shall post each certification received by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under this subsection to its publicly accessible Internet website.(i) If the county board of elections fails to comply with this section or with any directive or instruction issued by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under this section, the following shall apply:(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the failure shall not constitute competent evidence in any administrative, legislative or judicial proceeding, including any petition for recount under section 1404(e), 1701, 1702 or 1703.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Secretary of the Commonwealth may bring an action to enforce this section and may introduce as evidence the failure of the county board of elections to comply with this section or any directive or instruction issued by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under this section.(3) The failure shall not be cause or justification for delaying or refusing to perform any duty assigned under this act, including the county board of elections' duty to receive, canvass, compute or certify the returns of each election under section 302(k).20250HB1235PN1371 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1235PN1371 - 9 - 1